Utah statutes.
78B-6-802.   Unlawful detainer by tenant for a term less than life.
(1)  A tenant holding real property for a term less than life, is guilty of an
unlawful detainer if the tenant:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(i), continues in possession, in
person or by subtenant, of the property or any part of it, after the
expiration of the specified term or period for which it is let to him, which
specified term or period, whether established by express or implied contract,
or whether written or parol, shall be terminated without notice at the
expiration of the specified term or period;
(b)  having leased real property for an indefinite time with monthly or other
periodic rent reserved and except as provided in Subsection (1)(i):
(i)  continues in possession of it in person or by subtenant after the end of
any month or period, in cases where the owner, the owner's designated agent,
or any successor in estate of the owner, 15 calendar days or more prior to the
end of that month or period, has served notice requiring the tenant to quit
the premises at the expiration of that month or period; or
(ii)  in cases of tenancies at will, remains in possession of the premises
after the expiration of a notice of not less than five calendar days;
(c)  continues in possession, in person or by subtenant, after default in the
payment of any rent or other amounts due and after a notice in writing
requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent and other amounts due or
the surrender of the detained premises, has remained uncomplied with for a
period of three calendar days after service, which notice may be served at any
time after the rent becomes due;
(d)  assigns or sublets the leased premises contrary to the covenants of the
lease, or commits or permits waste on the premises after service of a three
calendar days' notice to quit;
(e)  sets up or carries on any unlawful business on or in the premises after
service of a three calendar days' notice to quit;
(f)  suffers, permits, or maintains on or about the premises any nuisance,
including nuisance as defined in Section 78B-6-1107 after service of a three
calendar days' notice to quit;
(g)  commits a criminal act on the premises and remains in possession after
service of a three calendar days' notice to quit;
(h)  continues in possession, in person or by subtenant, after a neglect or
failure to perform any condition or covenant of the lease or agreement under
which the property is held, other than those previously mentioned, and after
notice in writing requiring in the alternative the performance of the
conditions or covenant or the surrender of the property, served upon the
tenant and upon any subtenant in actual occupation of the premises remains
uncomplied with for three calendar days after service; or
(i) (i)  is a tenant under a bona fide tenancy as provided in Section 702 of
the Protecting Tenants at Foreclosure Act of 2009, Pub. L. 111-22; and
(ii)  continues in possession after the effective date of a notice to vacate
given in accordance with Section 702 of the Protecting Tenants at Foreclosure
Act of 2009, Pub. L. 111-22.
(2)  Within three calendar days after the service of the notice, the tenant,
any subtenant in actual occupation of the premises, any mortgagee of the term,
or other person interested in its continuance may perform the condition or
covenant and thereby save the lease from forfeiture, except that if the
covenants and conditions of the lease violated by the lessee cannot afterwards
be performed, or the violation cannot be brought into compliance, the notice
provided for in Subsections (1)(d) through (g) may be given.
(3)  Unlawful detainer by an owner resident of a mobile home is determined
under Title 57, Chapter 16, Mobile Home Park Residency Act.
(4)  The notice provisions for nuisance in Subsections (1)(d) through (g) do
not apply to nuisance actions provided in Sections 78B-6-1107 through
78B-6-1114.
